Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska51-418
Interlibrary loan service; provide.

The Nebraska Publications Clearinghouse shall provide access to local, state, federal and other governmental publications to state agencies and legislators and through interlibrary loan service to citizens of the state.

Laws 1972, LB 1284, § 8.